Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.177

Prostate cancer screening—Required coverage.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Each plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant.

(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

[2006 c 367 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.